Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.103

Office of independent investigations—Certain personnel exempted from chapter.

In addition to the exemptions set forth in RCW 41.06.070, the provisions of this chapter do not apply in the office of independent investigations to the director, to one confidential secretary, and to any deputy or regional directors, if any.

[ 2021 c 318 s 312.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2021 c 318: See note following RCW 43.102.020.